Missouri, session 2026, HB1956.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto three new sections, to
be known as sections 407.1170, 407.1171, and 407.1172, to read as follows:
407.1170. 1. After December 31, 2026, no person or entity shall sell any firearm
ammunition unless the person or entity is designated by the secretary of state as a
licensed ammunition seller.
2. This section shall not apply to:
(1) A commercial hunting club, provided the ammunition is used and consumed
on the premises of the club while engaged in lawful hunting activity;
(2) A domesticated game bird hunting club, provided the ammunition is used
and consumed on the premises of the club while engaged in lawful hunting activity;
(3) A domesticated migratory game bird shooting club, provided the
ammunition is used and consumed on the premises of the club while engaged in
lawful hunting activity;
(4) A nonprofit mutual or public benefit corporation that engages in recreational
shooting and lawful hunting activity, provided the ammunition is used and consumed
during a shooting or hunting event conducted by the corporation;
(5) A target shooting facility that holds a business or regulatory license, provided
the ammunition is kept within the facility's premises at all times and used on the
premises; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1956 2
(6) A person who sells no more than one hundred rounds of ammunition to one
vendor in one month and who cumulatively sells no more than two hundred fifty rounds
per year to vendors in this state.
3. The secretary of state may establish eligibility criteria for licensed
ammunition sellers. At a minimum, a licensed ammunition seller shall not be
prohibited by state or federal law or by a court order from possessing, receiving,
owning, or purchasing a firearm.
4. Beginning September 1, 2026, the secretary of state shall accept applications
for licensed ammunition sellers. The secretary of state may charge a fee sufficient to
cover reasonable costs of issuing a license. The secretary of state shall either issue a
license or deny an application within sixty days of receiving the application. If an
application is denied, the secretary of state shall inform the applicant of the reason for
denial in writing.
5. A license for a licensed ammunition seller shall be issued in a form prescribed
by the secretary of state. Licenses shall be valid for one year and shall authorize the
licensed ammunition seller to sell ammunition:
(1) From any location specified in the license; or
(2) At a gun show or event if the gun show or event is not conducted from any
motorized or towed vehicle.
6. The secretary of state shall promulgate regulations to implement the
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any
of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held
unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
7. Any person who sells firearm ammunition in violation of this section shall be
guilty of a class D misdemeanor. Each individual sale shall be deemed a separate
violation.
407.1171. 1. No licensed ammunition seller shall employ in a position that
handles, sells, delivers, or has custody or control of firearms or ammunition an agent or
employee who the seller knows or reasonably should know is prohibited by state or
federal law or by court order from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a
firearm or ammunition.

HB 1956 3
2. No licensed ammunition seller shall sell, offer for sale, or display for sale any
ammunition in a manner that allows the ammunition to be accessible to a purchaser
without the assistance of the seller or the seller's employee.
3. A violation of this section shall be a class D misdemeanor.
407.1172. 1. No person or entity shall supply, deliver, sell, or give possession or
control of any firearm ammunition to a person who the person or entity knows or has
cause to believe is prohibited by a court order from owning, possessing, or having
custody or control of any firearm ammunition.
2. No person or entity shall supply, deliver, sell, or give possession or control of
any firearm ammunition to:
(1) A person who the person or entity knows or has cause to believe is not the
actual purchaser of the ammunition; or
(2) A person who the person or entity knows or has cause to believe will
subsequently sell or transfer the ammunition to a person prohibited by a court order
from owning, possessing, or having custody or control of any firearm ammunition.
3. The sale, delivery, or transfer of firearm ammunition shall occur only in a
face-to-face transaction with the seller, deliverer, or transferor being provided bona fide
evidence of the identity of the purchaser or transferee. However, ammunition may be
purchased over the internet or through other means of remote ordering if the
ammunition is first delivered to a licensed ammunition seller in this state who verifies
the purchaser or transferee is not prohibited by state or federal law or by court order
from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm or ammunition.
4. After December 31, 2026, no resident of this state shall bring or transport into
this state firearm ammunition that the resident purchased outside of this state unless the
resident first has the ammunition delivered to a licensed ammunition seller in this state
for delivery to the resident after the seller verifies the purchaser or transferee is not
prohibited by state or federal law or by court order from possessing, receiving, owning,
or purchasing a firearm or ammunition. This subsection shall not apply to:
(1) A gunsmith acting in an official capacity;
(2) A wholesaler acting in an official capacity;
(3) A federally licensed manufacturer or importer of firearms or ammunition
acting in an official capacity;
(4) A licensed ammunition seller;
(5) A federally licensed collector of firearms;
(6) A law enforcement agency or agent thereof acting in an official capacity;
(7) A contract or common carrier or an authorized agent or employee thereof
acting in an official capacity;

HB 1956 4
(8) A person who purchases the ammunition from an immediate family member,
spouse, or registered domestic partner if the person brings or transports into this state
no more than fifty rounds;
(9) An executor or administrator of an estate that includes ammunition;
(10) A person who was not a resident of this state when he or she acquired the
ammunition;
(11) A hunter who purchased the ammunition for use in a lawful hunting activity
that occurred outside this state if the person brings or transports into this state no more
than fifty rounds; or
(12) A person who participates in an organized competitive match or league
competition that involves the use of firearms in a match or competition sponsored by,
conducted under the auspices of, or approved by a law enforcement agency or nationally
recognized or state-recognized entity that fosters proficiency in, or promotes education
about, firearms if the person brings or transports into this state no more than fifty
rounds.
5. A violation of this section shall be a class B misdemeanor.
✔